Washington statutes.
RCW 35.92.075

Indebtedness incurred on credit of expected utility revenues.

A city or town may contract indebtedness and borrow money for a period not in excess of two years for any public utility purpose on the credit of the revenues expected from such public utility.

[ 1982 c 24 s 1.]